Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 2. District Boundary Board

Limitations of act. —

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 4, provides: “The legislature recognizes organization into unified districts under the Wyoming School District Organization Act of 1969 has been completed to the extent contemplated by that act. This act is not intended to require the reorganization or adjustment of the boundaries of any current school district, but is to be construed to allow more streamlined and less cumbersome reorganization and boundary adjustments of school districts as specified in this act. Nothing in this act authorizes the operation of a non-unified school district other than those elementary school districts properly operating as of the effective date of this act. Nothing in this act authorizes the creation of any additional non-unified school districts.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools §§ 15 to 50.

78 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts § 389.

§ 21-6-201.
Purpose.

The legislature of the state of Wyoming hereby declares that this article is passed to provide for the organization, reorganization and boundary adjustment of the school districts in this state whereby school districts can be organized to:

Provide an improved and more equalized educational opportunity for all of the pupils in the state;

Provide a wiser and more efficient use of public funds for education, and making allowance for local conditions, special needs and problems and educational cost differentials, to achieve financial parity among school districts;

Allow the initial planning for the organization, reorganization and adjustment of boundaries of school districts under this article to be conducted on the local level; and

Simplify the organization, reorganization and adjustment of boundaries of school districts.

The legislature recognizes organization into unified districts under the Wyoming School District Organization Act of 1969 has been completed to the extent contemplated by that act. Further organization, reorganization and adjustment of boundaries of school districts in Wyoming shall be accomplished in accordance with the provisions of this article.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 1.

Students are denied equal protection in the event the disparity of valuation becomes too great. —

Johnson v. Schrader, 507 P.2d 814,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1973).

§ 21-6-202.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“School district” includes unified school districts and elementary school districts pursuant to W.S.

21-3-102

;

“State committee” means the state board of education;

“Trustee residence area” means a geographical area within a unified school district from which a member or members of the board of trustees of the school district is nominated. Any person desiring to be a candidate for the office of a school district trustee shall be a resident of the residence area which he seeks to represent;

“Unified school district” means a district supporting at least grades kindergarten or one (1) through twelve (12) under the control of one (1) board of trustees and administered by one (1) superintendent of schools, that offers an adequate and integrated educational program.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2006, ch. 43, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(i), substituted “pursuant to W.S.

21-3-102

” for “authorized under W.S.

21-6-224

.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “of education” for “and state superintendent” in (a)(ii).

Laws 2006, ch. 43, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2006.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

The state committee is in fact a board

made up of the state superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education having both management and final authority to act. Wyoming. Geraud v. Schrader, 531 P.2d 872,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 904, 96 S. Ct. 205, 46 L. Ed. 2d 134, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 3003 (U.S. 1975).

§ 21-6-203.
District boundary boards; membership; style.

The county assessor, the board of county commissioners and the county treasurer shall constitute a board for establishing school districts in the county. If two (2) or more counties are involved, the county assessor, the board of county commissioners and the county treasurer from each county shall comprise the board. The board shall be styled “the district boundary board of
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
county or counties, Wyoming.”

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 1.

A county committee on school district reorganization must be presumed to know the law

and the extent of the state committee's powers. Johnson v. Schrader, 502 P.2d 371,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1972), modified, 507 P.2d 814,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1973).

Its function is to prepare and submit plan. —

The function of the county committee is to prepare and submit a plan of organization for a unified school district or unified school districts within the county. Lund v. Schrader, 492 P.2d 202,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1971).

§ 21-6-204.
Quorum; majority vote.

A majority of the members of the district boundary board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. No action of the district boundary board shall be valid unless the action is approved by a majority of the members.

Expenses incurred by the district boundary board in the performance of its duties required by this article shall be borne by the county treasury.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 1.

§ 21-6-205.
Chairman; meetings.

The district boundary board shall elect a chairman. He shall call a meeting of the district boundary board in the first quarter of each calendar year for the purpose of electing one (1) of the members as secretary. Thereafter, meetings shall be held upon the call of the chairman or of a majority of the members of the board.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 1.

§ 21-6-206.
Duties of secretary.

The secretary shall keep an accurate record showing the boundaries of all the districts in his county. The secretary shall give each member one (1) day written notice before each hearing or meeting and shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation within the county, notice of any hearing or meeting at which a change in boundaries or reorganization of a school district or combining of school districts is to be considered at least once each week for the two (2) weeks immediately preceding the time set for the hearing or meeting.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 1.

§ 21-6-207.
Proposal to change boundaries, reorganize or combine districts; criteria.

Any district boundary board or any two (2) or more district boundary boards acting jointly may, when in the judgment of the board it would be for the benefit of the educational needs of the pupils, and only when each school district board consents, submit in writing to the state committee a proposal which would:

Alter and change the boundaries of any school district of any kind; or

Reorganize any school district or portions of districts; or

Combine any school district or portion thereof with any adjoining school district or districts; provided that no existing district shall be divided in any manner which will leave the total assessed valuation of its property less in proportion to the number of children shown in its census than the average ratio for all school districts in the county unless the trustees for those districts agree thereto.

Except as provided in this subsection, all actions taken under this article shall conform to the following criteria:

School districts shall be organized as efficient administrative units considering primarily the education, convenience and welfare of the children;

Except as authorized in W.S.

21-6-223

, the entire state shall be divided into unified school districts;

All territory of each school district shall be contiguous;

All territory within a school district shall be a single area from which trustees are elected at-large or be divided into trustee residence areas. Each trustee residence area shall be contiguous. In establishing trustee residence areas, the structure for election of trustees shall be in accordance with W.S. 21-3-111(b);

In developing proposals for organization, reorganization and adjustment of boundaries the district boundary boards shall consider a ratio of average daily membership to assessed valuation as nearly equalized as practicable among the districts in the various counties;

Each proposal shall include provisions for educational opportunity and services as nearly equal as possible in all areas of each district;

A public hearing or hearings shall be held prior to the submission of a proposal by the district boundary boards prior to the organization, reorganization, boundary adjustment or combining of school districts to receive and keep a record of testimony. Notice of each public hearing shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the area at least once each week for the two (2) weeks immediately preceding the time set for each hearing. The notice shall contain a statement of the time and place of the hearing and a brief summary of its purpose. In addition, at least ten (10) days and not more than fourteen (14) days before the hearing, a copy of the notice shall be sent by mail to each school district trustee residing in the area involved in the hearing. A subcommittee composed of not less than three (3) members of each district boundary board involved, may hold any hearing required to be held under this paragraph.

Unless the state committee determines the information required by this subsection is not necessary for a proposal, a district boundary board proposal submitted to the state committee shall contain:

A name and number of the proposed district;

A map showing the boundaries of established school districts and the boundaries proposed;

A description of the proposed boundaries;

Recommendations respecting the location of schools, the utilization of existing buildings, allocation of existing indebtedness, the employment of existing personnel, the procedure for the reduction in force of employees and the transportation requirements under the proposal;

A summary of the reasons for the proposal;

A record of all hearings;

A summary of anticipated improvement in education; and

Other reports, records and materials as the district boundary board or the state committee deems appropriate.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 1.

A school district reorganization plan must show conformity to the statutory criteria of this section,

and state the reasons the plan conforms not only in that particular, but in order to manifest full compliance with the entire Wyoming. Geraud v. Schrader, 531 P.2d 872,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 904, 96 S. Ct. 205, 46 L. Ed. 2d 134, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 3003 (U.S. 1975).

County plan meeting criteria should be accepted. —

If a county plan meets the criteria standards specified by this section, then and in that event it should be accepted and not rejected by the state committee; and if the rejection is without proper reason or authority, it is arbitrary and void. Johnson v. Schrader, 502 P.2d 371,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1972), modified, 507 P.2d 814,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1973).

Delegation of duties to boundary board is valid. —

While establishment of school districts and changes therein is legislative function under art. 7, § 1, Wyo. Const., legislative delegation of such duty to district boundary boards in each county is valid. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R. v. Byron Sch. Dist., 37 Wyo. 259, 260 P. 537,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 1927).

The boundary board merely proposes changes

in boundaries. It does not actually effect changes.
Board of Trustees v. District Boundary Bd., 489 P.2d 413,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 253

(Wyo. 1971).

Proposals which board may make. —

The boundary board can propose to alter or change the boundaries of any school district (singular); it may propose to reorganize any such district (singular) or portions of districts; and it may propose to combine any such district (singular) or portion thereof, when such district or portion has less than eight pupils, with an adjoining school district or districts. Board of Trustees v. District Boundary Bd., 489 P.2d 413,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 253

(Wyo. 1971).

Proposal for consolidation. —

There is no language in this section which authorizes the board to make recommendations for a consolidation of all school districts into a single unified district, unless all of the smaller districts which are combined with a larger one have less than eight pupils. Board of Trustees v. District Boundary Bd., 489 P.2d 413,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 253

(Wyo. 1971).

§ 21-6-208.
Creation of new unified school districts from within boundaries of existing school districts.

Whenever at least one hundred (100) qualified electors of any area within an existing school district, which area includes both a high school and one (1) or more elementary schools with a total K-12 enrollment of more than five hundred (500) pupils, petition the district boundary board for creation of the area into a new unified school district, the district boundary board may, after holding a hearing on the petition, submit a proposal to form the area into a new unified school district to the state committee.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 1.

For information regarding joining of unified school district with poorer district,

and suggestions for equalization of ad valorem taxation for school purposes, see Sweetwater County Planning Comm. for Organization of School Dists. v. Hinkle, 491 P.2d 1234,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1971).

§ 21-6-209.
Proposal to abolish or combine district failing to maintain school.

Whenever any district fails to maintain a school for a period of six (6) months in any school year, a district boundary board shall, within thirty (30) days after the conclusion of the six (6) months, submit to the state committee a proposal to abolish or combine the school district or portion thereof with any adjoining school district or districts.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 1.

§ 21-6-210.
Powers and duties of state committee.

The state committee shall:

Aid the district boundary boards in carrying out the powers and duties vested in and imposed upon those boards by this article, as authorized by the state superintendent, and provide plans for procedure, standards, data, maps and other information and services for district boundary boards throughout the state as it appears to the state committee necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes of this article;

Receive, file and review all proposals for organization, reorganization and boundary adjustments submitted to it by a district boundary board and either approve the proposals or reject them with reasons for rejection and recommendations for making the proposal acceptable as provided in W.S.

21-6-211

.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 1; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

deleted “by furnishing assistance of the employed staff of the department,” after “boards by this article,” in (a)(i).

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

The state committee is a board

made up of the state superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education having both management and final authority to act. Wyoming. Geraud v. Schrader, 531 P.2d 872,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 904, 96 S. Ct. 205, 46 L. Ed. 2d 134, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 3003 (U.S. 1975).

The state committee cannot levy taxes.

Lund v. Schrader, 492 P.2d 202,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1971).

The state committee is “out of the business” of originating plans. —

Geraud v. Schrader, 531 P.2d 872,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 904, 96 S. Ct. 205, 46 L. Ed. 2d 134, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 3003 (U.S. 1975).

No authority to set up separate Indian reservation school district. —

There is no authority in the state committee or any county committee to set up a separate Indian reservation school district. Wyoming. Geraud v. Schrader, 531 P.2d 872,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 904, 96 S. Ct. 205, 46 L. Ed. 2d 134, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 3003 (U.S. 1975).

State committee determines whether plan by county committee complies with law. —

The state committee determines whether the plan of organization submitted by the county committee complies with the School District Organization Law by conforming to the criteria and procedures specified in such law. Lund v. Schrader, 492 P.2d 202,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1971).

§ 21-6-211.
Approval or rejection of proposal by state committee.

Within ninety (90) days after receipt of a proposal from any district boundary board, the state committee shall either approve or reject the proposal and notify the district boundary board of its action. In approving or rejecting a proposal, the state committee shall consider the effect of the proposal upon the purposes stated in this article. No proposal shall be approved if in the opinion of the state committee it fails to comply with the provisions or purposes of this article. If a proposal is rejected, the state committee shall enter its order with reasons for the rejection and recommendations for making the proposal acceptable. If a proposal is rejected, a district boundary board may resubmit a modified proposal as often as necessary or may appeal the rejection pursuant to W.S.

21-6-224

. When a proposal is approved, the state committee shall make an order establishing the school district according to the approved proposal. An order of the state committee pursuant to this section shall be the final administrative determination and shall be filed with the county clerk of each county involved within ten (10) days from the approval or rejection of the proposal, in accordance with W.S.

21-6-212

.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 1.

No authority to set up separate Indian reservation school district. —

There is no authority in the state committee or any county committee to set up a separate Indian reservation school district. Wyoming. Geraud v. Schrader, 531 P.2d 872,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 904, 96 S. Ct. 205, 46 L. Ed. 2d 134, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 3003 (U.S. 1975).

State committee determines whether plan by county committee complies with law. —

The state committee determines whether the plan of organization submitted by the county committee complies with the School District Organization Law by conforming to the criteria and procedures specified in such law. Lund v. Schrader, 492 P.2d 202,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1971).

The state committee can reject a county committee plan only if it fails to comply

with the provisions of this chapter. Board of Trustees v. District Boundary Bd., 489 P.2d 413,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 253

(Wyo. 1971).

State committee must have sufficient information to justify determination. —

The state reorganization committee, as an administrative agency, must have sufficient information before it to justify its determination that a county plan does not meet the necessary criteria requirements. Johnson v. Schrader, 502 P.2d 371,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1972), modified, 507 P.2d 814,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1973).

Otherwise its action must be considered arbitrary.

Johnson v. Schrader, 502 P.2d 371,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1972), modified, 507 P.2d 814,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1973).

Rejection without proper reason or authority is void. —

If the state committee's rejection of a county plan is without proper reason or authority, it is arbitrary and void. Johnson v. Schrader, 502 P.2d 371,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1972), modified, 507 P.2d 814,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1973).

No law says a county has to be a single countywide school district.

If the state committee made that determination and for that reason refused approval of a plan submitted by the county committee, it acted without authority and in excess of its power. Johnson v. Schrader, 502 P.2d 371,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1972), modified, 507 P.2d 814,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1973).

County committee can resubmit modified plan as often as necessary. —

No matter if a previous plan (or plans) of the county committee has been rejected, that committee can resubmit a modified plan as often as necessary, as long as the county committee continues in existence. Board of Trustees v. District Boundary Bd., 489 P.2d 413,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 253

(Wyo. 1971).

Reviewing court not obligated to determine basis for ultimate fact. —

It is not an obligation of a reviewing court to dig into all of the detailed information gathered in the comprehensive studies made by the county committee, as well as the state committee, and determine the basis for an ultimate fact. Wyoming. Geraud v. Schrader, 531 P.2d 872,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 904, 96 S. Ct. 205, 46 L. Ed. 2d 134, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 3003 (U.S. 1975).

Efforts of county committee must have precedence over proposal. —

This section means that efforts of the county committee, which is defined as the county planning committee for the organization of school districts, must have precedence over proposals of the district boundary board on matters of school district organization. Board of Trustees v. District Boundary Bd., 489 P.2d 413,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 253

(Wyo. 1971).

§ 21-6-212.
Filing of notice of approval or rejection; proposal effective on filing.

The district boundary board shall file with the county clerk, within ten (10) days from the date of approval or rejection by the state committee, any notice of approval or rejection received from the state committee. An approved proposal shall take effect upon such filing or a later date if specified in the approved proposal. The final administrative action of the state committee shall be appealable from the date of filing with the county clerk under this section.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 1.

§ 21-6-213.
Notice to districts affected by action of committee.

When a district boundary board proposal organizing or reorganizing a school district or altering or changing the boundaries of any district or districts is approved or rejected by the state committee, the secretary shall promptly notify the clerk of the district board in each of the districts affected, in writing, giving in the notice the number of the district or districts affected and describing their boundaries and other changes approved or rejected.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 1.

§ 21-6-214.
City or town to be all in one district; district may include other territory.

Whenever the district boundary board organizes or reorganizes a school district or changes the boundaries of existing districts, the organization, reorganization or change shall be made so as to keep all territory embraced in any incorporated city or town in one (1) school district. A district boundary board may include in any school district territory not within such corporate boundaries. District boundary boards are hereby authorized to change the boundaries of any school district or districts so that all the territory embraced in a corporate city or town shall be in one (1) district.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 1.

§ 21-6-215.
Appointment and terms of trustees for new districts.

Whenever a new district is created under the provisions of this article, the district boundary board shall appoint a board of trustees for the new district from the combined membership of all the original boards of trustees of the districts involved based upon at-large appointments or through established trustee residence areas in accordance with W.S. 21-3-111(b)(ii). The district boundary board shall make provision for staggering terms so that a proportion of the membership, as nearly equal as possible, will be elected every two (2) years in the manner provided for the regular election of school board members. The appointed board shall consist of five (5), seven (7) or nine (9) members, who shall serve for not less than two (2) years following the effective date of the plan and until December 1 following the first or second regularly scheduled school election following the effective date of the plan. Thereafter, all trustees shall be elected for four (4) year terms, except those who may fill unexpired terms.

All trustees shall be elected by the electorate of the entire school district. According to the approved proposal and except those districts for which membership is based upon at-large appointments pursuant to W.S. 21-3-111(b)(i), each trustee residence area shall be entitled to one (1) or more representatives on the board and the candidate nominated from each trustee residence area receiving the largest number of votes shall be elected. If a member of the board of trustees shall become a nonresident of the district or the trustee residence area from which elected during his term of office, as applicable, he shall be deemed thereby to vacate his office. Any vacancy which for any reason occurs on the board shall be filled by a majority vote of the remaining members by the appointment of a resident of the district or the trustee residence area in which the vacancy occurs, as appropriate, and the appointee shall hold his office until the next annual election, at which a trustee shall be duly elected and qualified for the remainder of the unexpired term.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 1.

§ 21-6-216.
Newly organized school district a body corporate; authority of trustees; old districts to cease to exist.

On the effective date of the proposal, each proposed newly organized school district shall be and become a body corporate under the name and number as indicated in the proposal as a school district, and the new board of trustees shall have full authority and power to act as the board of trustees to do all things necessary with reference to the business and educational affairs of the new school district using the funds on hand or the funds received through existing levies of the old districts as nearly as practicable for the balance of the fiscal year.

When members of the board of trustees of the new school district assume their duties as provided in this article on the effective date of the proposal each of the old districts or portions of districts from which the new district was formed shall cease to exist as a legal entity and the board of trustees of each former district or districts situated within the new district shall cease to function and the terms of office of the members thereof shall automatically expire.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 1.

§ 21-6-217.
New districts may draw proportion of funds from old districts; transfer of property.

Whenever the district boundary board establishes a new district from districts already organized, the board of trustees of the newly organized district may draw its proportion of the public school funds for paying teachers or other legal school expenses from the school treasury of the district or districts from which it was separated until such time as the newly organized district receives its proper apportionment of school monies and taxes. In like manner, any district that is established from two (2) or more districts may draw its proportion of the proper school funds for payment of teachers or other necessary legal school expenses from the treasuries of the former districts.

All real and personal property of any district combined under this article shall be and become the property of the newly organized district. All real and personal property shall be transferred or conveyed by operation of law unless otherwise provided in the approved proposal. However, real property which was transferred in accordance with this subsection from a then existing school district to a newly organized school district and on which is located a structure used as a school which the district has closed or intends to close shall not be conveyed or offered for sale to any other entity unless the municipality in which the property is located is first offered a right to purchase the property. If the municipality and school board cannot agree on a price for the property, the property shall be sold to the highest bidder at a public auction.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 1.

New district must prove share to which it was entitled. —

A new district formed from another district and suing the latter for a share of its funds under this section must show the share to which it was entitled at time of division. School Dist. v. School Dist., 29 Wyo. 80, 210 P. 562,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1922).

Contract as to apportionment of funds is void. —

In action based on contract between old and new school district for apportionment of funds, contract was void and inadmissible as evidence, since action should have been brought under this section. School Dist. v. School Dist., 51 Wyo. 370, 67 P.2d 192, 71 P.2d 137,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1937).

§ 21-6-218.
Allocation of assets and debts upon reorganization of districts.

Whenever a district boundary board reorganizes any school districts under the provisions of this article, the board shall allocate equitably the assets and debts of the districts affected by the action of the district boundary board.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 1.

Legislature may provide for division of property and debts in reorganization. —

The legislature, having plenary power over school districts, may provide for the division of the property and the apportionment of debts in the reorganization of school districts. Lund v. Schrader, 492 P.2d 202,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1971).

The indebtedness spread in the creation of a unified school district

is not a new burden; no new debt is created; there is merely a division of one already existing. Lund v. Schrader, 492 P.2d 202,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1971).

Component districts may be held liable to pay their proportionate share of existing debts.

Lund v. Schrader, 492 P.2d 202,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1971).

Debts must be allocated according to benefits. —

There must be a bona fide allocation of debts to any area according to benefits received by that area from additional assets being brought into the unification. Lund v. Schrader, 492 P.2d 202,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1971).

Existing debts cannot automatically and arbitrarily be spread evenly

over the entire area included in a unified school district. The fact that such was done in a county unification makes the allocation suspect. Lund v. Schrader, 492 P.2d 202,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1971).

Contract as to apportionment is void. —

In action based on contract between old and new school district for apportionment of funds, contract was void and inadmissible as evidence, since action should have been brought under § 21-6-112.School Dist. v. School Dist., 51 Wyo. 370, 67 P.2d 192, 71 P.2d 137,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1937).

Indebtedness as prerequisite. —

Apportionment of credits and indebtedness must be made in same manner in which indebtedness and credits are apportioned when county is divided, and as no apportionment can be made in case of division of counties except only when an indebtedness exists, the same condition must exist for an apportionment when a new school district is created out of old one. School Dist. v. School Dist., 51 Wyo. 370, 67 P.2d 192,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo.), vacated in part, 51 Wyo. 370, 67 P.2d 192,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1937).

§ 21-6-219.
Adjustment of state foundation entitlement.

When two (2) or more districts or parts of districts are organized into a school district and the total fiscal resources of the new school district are less than the combined fiscal resources of the districts the last year before organization, then the state superintendent shall adjust the state foundation entitlement to compensate for the differences in fiscal resources. The adjustment shall be equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the initial difference in each of the first two (2) fiscal years after the new organization, fifty percent (50%) of the initial difference in the third fiscal year and twenty-five percent (25%) of the initial difference in the fourth fiscal year. The adjustment shall also provide reimbursement for expenses incurred by the school districts involved in the new organization. Expenses which are reimbursable shall be determined in accordance with rules adopted by the state superintendent, shall not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00), and shall be paid in equal amounts over a period not to exceed three (3) fiscal years.

When any district consolidates two (2) or more schools within the district and the total state aid to the district would decrease because of the consolidation, the state superintendent shall adjust the state foundation entitlement to compensate for the decrease for not more than one (1) year.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 1; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “director” for “state superintendent” throughout the section.

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “state superintendent” for “director” in the (a) and (b).

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

§ 21-6-220.
Name or number of newly created district.

In all cases, where a school district created by the action of the boundary board has been created from the territory of preexisting school districts, or the territory formerly belonging to a school district is annexed to a preexisting district, the district boundary board shall designate a descriptive name and a number for the newly created district or the district to which territory was added.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 1.

§ 21-6-221.
School advisory boards.

Whenever any school within any school district is located twenty (20) road miles or more from the nearest town or city that is the population center of the district and whenever fifty percent (50%) of the parents of children attending the school agree, they may call a meeting at the school for the purpose of electing an advisory board of three (3) members for a term of three (3) years. The initial board shall have one (1) member elected for one (1) year, one (1) member for two (2) years and one (1) member for three (3) years.

The advisory board may aid and advise the board of trustees of the district in all matters concerning the operation of the school in their area. The advisory board may present grievances and recommendations at any regular meeting of the board of trustees of the district.

The advisory board secretary shall keep minutes of the meetings of the advisory board. These minutes shall be submitted to the board of trustees of the district and read at their next scheduled meeting.

There shall be an election held annually for the purpose of electing a successor for the advisor whose term has expired. An advisor may be elected to succeed himself or herself. The election need not comply with the elections provisions of this code.

Following the election of the advisory board the members of the board shall organize themselves by electing one (1) of their members as chairman and one (1) as secretary.

The district trustee, within whose election area the school is located, is an ex officio member of the advisory board but shall not vote.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 1.

§ 21-6-222.
Election of elementary school districts to create unified school districts; levy of taxes at maximum rates.

Any elementary school district not yet organized and unified under the provisions of the Wyoming School District Organization Act of 1969, may petition the district boundary board to be included within a unified school district of the county in which it is located.

Any elementary school district electing to come under the provisions of this section shall levy taxes in the same manner and subject to the same maximum rates as provided for the unified school district.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 1.

§ 21-6-223.
Elementary school districts not electing to organize and unify; affiliation with unified high school districts.

An elementary school district not electing to unify shall affiliate itself with a unified school district and become an elementary supporting district for the high school within that district for purposes as defined by law.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 1.

§ 21-6-224.
Judicial review of actions of board.

Any school district or a district boundary board, if aggrieved by any action of the state committee, may institute proceedings for judicial review thereof in the district court of the county in which an affected school district is located pursuant to provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. No other person shall have standing to appeal a decision of the state committee made under this article. The state committee shall be named defendant, and service of process shall be pursuant to the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure.

The appeal shall be heard promptly. Pending the appeal provided by this section, all proceedings regarding the proposal shall be stayed unless otherwise ordered by the court to which appeal is taken.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, see § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).

§ 21-6-225.
Contract rights and benefits of employees and teachers.

No contract right, fringe benefit, benefit granted under school policies, or continuing contract status of any employee, or any rights under the Wyoming Teachers’ Employment Act shall be denied or reduced as a result of school district reorganization, except as provided by W.S. 21-7-111(a)(iv). The new school district shall have the right to establish a uniform salary and benefit schedule for employees of the previous school districts and shall have the right to establish the length of the contract year.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 1.